Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.167

Washington youth and families fund.

(1)(a) There is created in the custody of the state treasurer an account to be known as the Washington youth and families fund. Revenues to the fund consist of appropriations by the legislature, private contributions, and all other sources deposited in the fund.

(b) Expenditures from the fund may only be used for the purposes of the program established in this section, including administrative expenses. Only the director of the department of commerce, or the director's designee, may authorize expenditures.

(c) Expenditures from the fund are exempt from appropriations and the allotment provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW. However, money used for program administration by the department is subject to the allotment and budgetary controls of chapter 43.88 RCW, and an appropriation is required for these expenditures.

(2) The department may expend moneys from the fund to provide state matching funds for housing-based supportive services for homeless youth and families.

(3) Activities eligible for funding through the fund include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Case management;

(b) Counseling;

(c) Referrals to employment support and job training services and direct employment support and job training services;

(d) Domestic violence services and programs;

(e) Mental health treatment, services, and programs;

(f) Substance abuse treatment, services, and programs;

(g) Parenting skills education and training;

(h) Transportation assistance;

(i) Child care; and

(j) Other supportive services identified by the department to be an important link for housing stability.

(4) Organizations that may receive funds from the fund include local housing authorities, nonprofit community or neighborhood-based organizations, public development authorities, federally recognized Indian tribes in the state, and regional or statewide nonprofit housing assistance organizations.

[ 2015 c 69 s 24; 2009 c 565 s 9; 2004 c 276 s 718.]

NOTES:

Severability—2004 c 276: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2004 c 276 s 915.]

Effective date—2004 c 276: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 1, 2004]." [ 2004 c 276 s 916.]